Utah statutes.
62A-15-502.5.   Intoxicated Driver Rehabilitation Account -- Created.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Intoxicated Driver Rehabilitation Account."

(2)  The restricted account created in Subsection (1) consists of assessments as provided for in Section 62A-15-503.

(3)  Upon appropriations from the Legislature, money from the account created in Subsection (1) shall be used as prescribed in Section 62A-15-503.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2010 General Session

